District of Columbia statutes.
7-2038

License renewal.

(a)

A license shall be renewed in accordance with rules established pursuant to this subchapter, unless there is a pending disciplinary action by the Mayor.

(b)

An application for renewal of a license shall be submitted to the Mayor no later than 90 days before expiration of the license on a form provided by the Mayor with the appropriate renewal fee. An application for renewal fewer than 90 days after expiration, shall be renewed in accordance with renewal requirements established by rule, including the payment of the renewal fee and any late penalty.

(c)

A child development facility holding a valid license at the time of application for renewal shall continue to operate as licensed until the Mayor acts on the renewal application.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 9, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3628.

See notes to § 7-2031.

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.